Washington statutes.
RCW 18.50.102

License renewal.

(1) A licensed midwife must renew the individual's license according to the following requirements:

(a) Completion of a minimum of 30 hours of continuing education, approved by the secretary, every three years;

(b) Proof of participation in a Washington state coordinated quality improvement program as detailed in rule;

(c) Proof of participation in data submission on perinatal outcomes to a national or state research organization, as detailed in rule; and

(d) Fees determined by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

(2) The secretary shall write rules regarding the renewal requirements and the department's process for verification of the third-party data submission.

[ 2022 c 289 s 4; 2014 c 187 s 3; 1996 c 191 s 25; 1991 c 3 s 110; 1985 c 7 s 49; 1981 c 53 s 13.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1981 c 53: See note following RCW 18.50.005.

Limitation on increases in midwifery fees: RCW 43.24.086.